Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-507
Practice of
audiology, defined.

Practice of audiology means
the application of evidence-based practice in clinical decisionmaking for
the prevention, assessment, habilitation, rehabilitation, and maintenance
of persons with hearing, auditory function, and vestibular function impairments
and related impairments, including (1) cerumen removal from the cartilaginous
outer one-third portion of the external auditory canal when the presence of
cerumen may affect the accuracy of hearing evaluations or impressions of the
ear canal for amplification devices and (2) evaluation, selection, fitting,
and dispensing of hearing instruments, external processors
of implantable hearing instruments, and assistive
technology devices as part of a comprehensive audiological rehabilitation
program. Practice of audiology does not include the practice of medical diagnosis,
medical treatment, or surgery.

Laws 2007, LB247, § 67;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 192;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 8.